District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-615.01

Declaration of purpose.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1501, 25 DCR 5740
Oct. 7, 1998, D.C. Law 12-160, § 102(b), 45 DCR 5147

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-616.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-345.1.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of §§ 1-615.01 through 1-615.03, see § 102(b) of the Whistleblower Reinforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-400, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 5158) and § 102(b) of the Whistleblower Reinforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-464, October 28, 1998, 45 DCR 7821).